Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4400.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 697c. (1) A dealer or distributor shall not sell or offer for sale or operate any vehicle in this state that is designed, developed, or manufactured by a foreign entity of concern. (2) A dealer or distributor that violates this section is subject to a civil fine of not more than $50,000.00 per violation. In addition to a civil fine under this subsection, a vehicle sold or owned in violation of this section is subject to seizure and forfeiture. (3) As used in this section, "foreign entity of concern" means a foreign entity that is any of the following: (a) Designated as a foreign terrorist organization under 8 USC 1189. (b) Included on the list of specially designated nationals and blocked persons maintained by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the United States Department of Treasury. (c) Owned by, controlled by, or subject to the jurisdiction or direction of a government of a foreign country that is a covered nation as that term is defined in 10 USC 4872. (d) Alleged by the attorney general to have been involved in an activity for which a conviction was obtained under any of the following: (i) The espionage act of 1917, 18 USC 792 to 799. (ii) 18 USC 951 and 1030. (iii) The economic espionage act of 1996, 18 USC 1831 to 1839. (iv) The arms export control act, 22 USC 2751 to 2799aa-2. (v) 42 USC 2274 to 2277 and 2284. (vi) The export control reform act, 50 USC 4801 to 4852. (vii) The international emergency economic powers act, 50 USC 1701 to 1710. (e) The People's Republic of China. (f) The Russian Federation. (g) The Islamic Republic of Iran. (h) The Democratic People's Republic of Korea. (i) Cuba. (j) The Venezuelan regime of Nicolas Maduro. (k) The Syrian Arab Republic. (l) An agency or entity that is under significant control of a country listed under subparagraphs (e) to (k). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.